src/sma-lex.txt
LEXICON IJAADE_LOAN
+Use/Sub:aad NIEJTE ;
+Use/Sub:ad NIEJTE ;
+Use/Sub:jad NIEJTE ;
        :jaad NIEJTE ;
  +N+SgNomCmp+Dial/-NOR:ad    R ; !SW
    +N+SgNomCmp+Dial/-SW:ade    R ; !NOR


LEXICON IJAARE_LOAN
+Use/Sub:aar NIEJTE ;
+Use/Sub:ar NIEJTE ;
+Use/Sub:jar NIEJTE ;
        :jaar NIEJTE ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ar    R ;

LEXICON IJARKE_LOAN
+Use/Sub:aark NIEJTE ;
+Use/Sub:ark NIEJTE ;
:jaark NIEJTE ;
   +Use/Sub:jark NIEJTE ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ark    R ;


LEXICON AATE_LOAN 
  :at   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
  +Use/Sub:t NIEJTE ; ! 
  +Use/Sub:ht NIEJTE ; ! 
  +N+SgNomCmp:t    R ;
  
LEXICON AARE_LOAN 
  :ar   NIEJTE ;              ! januaare
  +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:r FINAL1 ; ! januar
  +Use/Sub:r NIEJTE ;         ! januare
  +N+SgNomCmp:r    R ;
 
LEXICON IJLE_LOAN_N 
  :ijl   NIEJTE ; ! 
  :ïjl   NIEJTE ; ! 
  
LEXICON EETE_LOAN 
  +Use/Sub+Use/NG:t   NIEJTE ; ! identitete
  :et   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les identiteete
  +N+SgNomCmp:t    R ;

LEXICON IJAANE_LOAN
  +Use/Sub+Use/NG:an NIEJTE ;
    +Use/Sub+Use/NG:aan NIEJTE ;
  +Use/Sub+Use/NG:jan NIEJTE ;
  :jaan   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
  +N+SgNomCmp:an    R ;

LEXICON  AANE_LOAN 
  +Use/Sub+Use/NG:n   NIEJTE ; ! banane
  :an   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
  +N+SgNomCmp:n    R ;

LEXICON  AADE_LOAN 
  :ad   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
+Use/Sub:d   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
  +N+SgNomCmp+Dial/-NOR:d    R ; !SW
    +N+SgNomCmp+Dial/-SW:de    R ; !NOR


LEXICON EEME_LOAN 
  +Use/Sub+Use/NG:m NIEJTE ; ! nasjovnale
  :em   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
  +N+SgNomCmp:m    R ;

LEXICON GRAMME_LOAN 
  :m   NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
  +N+SgNomCmp:    R ;
  
LEXICON  OVSE_LOAN ! ikke les 
  :vs   NIEJTE ; !sellulovse
  +Use/Sub:s NIEJTE ; !sellulose
  +N+SgNomCmp:se    R ;
  




LEXICON NIEJTE
+N+Sg: NIEJTESGNOM ;
+N+Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;
+N+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
+N: NIEJTEREST ;

LEXICON NIEJTEOBL ! This for reference from A sublexica
+Sg: NIEJTESGadjOBL ;
+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
     EVEN_ESS ;
     NIEJTE_CMPND ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGadjOBL !adj continued...
  +Nom+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>eme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>edh FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:e%>se FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>eme FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>emem FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>emdh FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>ene FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>esanne FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>esadth FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>estanne FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>estadth FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>enadth FINAL1 ;


LEXICON NIEJTE_SG
 NIEJTESGNOM ;
 NIEJTESGOBL ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGNOM
  +Nom:e          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGOBL
  +Nom+PxSg1:%>eme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2:%>edh FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg3:e%>se FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg1:%>eme FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>emem FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2:%>emdh FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1:%>ene FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+PxSg1:%>esanne FINAL1 ;
  +Ill+PxSg2:%>esadth FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+PxSg1:%>estanne FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>estadth FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2:%>enadth FINAL1 ;


LEXICON NIEJTE_PL
  +Nom:%>h        FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+Use/NG:%>eh       FINAL1 ; ! do not generate doubleform
  +Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>i        FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+Use/Sub:%>ij        FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
  +Com+Use/Sub:%>ijgujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON NIEJTEREST
        EVEN_ESS ;
        NIEJTE_CMPND ;
        NIEJTE_DER ;

LEXICON NIEJTE_CMPND
  +SgNomCmp:e    R ;
  +SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
  +PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;

LEXICON NIEJTE_DER
  +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ;
  +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Use/Sub:etj   GÅATETJE ;

  
LEXICON NIEJTE_COMP
NIEJTE ;
+N+Der/A:e EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON AARJEL_COMP
+N+Der/A: EVENCOMP ;
+N+Sg+Nom:l FINAL1 ;

  
LEXICON MAAKE
  +N+Der1+Der/Rec+N:e LAAHKOEH_EVEN ;
  +N+Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
  +N+Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
  +N:              EVEN_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e    R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ;

LEXICON ÅERPIENADTJH ! - plural noun
  +N+SgNomCmp:e    R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;
  +N+Pl+Nom:%>h        FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>eh       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Gen:%> IGENSUFF ;
  +N+Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ; !
  +N+Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:e%»tj   N_ODD_PL ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+SgNomCmp:e%»tje            R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:e%»tj%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  
LEXICON JOVKEMES 
+N+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2es%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Acc:asse%>m       FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Gen:asse%>n       FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ill:asse%>se      FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ine:asse%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ela:asse%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Com:ass%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Nom:%>ass%>h        FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Gen:%>ass%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+N+Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+N:ass            EVEN_ESS ;
+N+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMP2es%^DISIMP    R ;
+N+SgGenCmp:asse%>n R ;
+N+PlGenCmp:ass%>i  R ;
+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ass%>eme FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:ass%>edh FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:ass%>se FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:ass%>eme FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>emem FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:ass%>emdh FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:asse%>mse FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:ass%>ene FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:ass%>esanne FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:ass%>esadth FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:ass%>estanne FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>estadth FINAL1 ;
+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:ass%>enadth FINAL1 ;


! lexicon for vowel-final words with invariant stems
LEXICON KONTO
+N: KONTODECL ;


LEXICON KONTODECL
 +Sg: KONTO_SG  ;
 +Pl: KONTO_PL  ;
      EVEN_ESS ;
 +SgNomCmp:    R ;
 +SgGenCmp:%>n R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>j R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»tj GÅATETJE ;

LEXICON KONTO_SG
  +Nom:          FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! waiting with the Px forms for these (?) loanwords
!  +Nom+PxSg1:%>me FINAL1 ;
!  +Nom+PxSg2:%>dh FINAL1 ;
!  +Nom+PxSg3:%>se FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg1:%>me FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>mem FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg2:%>mdh FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
!  +Gen+PxSg1:%>ne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ill+PxSg1:%>asanne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ill+PxSg2:%>asadth FINAL1 ;
!  +Ela+PxSg1:%>astanne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>astadth FINAL1 ;
!  +Com+PxSg2:%>anadth FINAL1 ;

LEXICON KONTO_PL
  +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>jgyjmie FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON MARS
+N+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! mars
 NIEJTE ; ! marse


LEXICON JUNI
+N+Sg+Nom:i FINAL1 ;  !juni
+N+Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;  ! junesne
+N+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:i    R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;
+N:              EVEN_ESS ;



! Sub-paradigm inflections:
! -------------------------

LEXICON EVEN_ESS
  +Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;


! Old, not used, retained at the moment to remember the history:
!LEXICON I-CLASS ! Links from propernoun (revise?)
!  :%>i   IJ-CASE ; ! others have -ine etc.
!                I-EVEN ;
!                I-ODD ;
!
!LEXICON I-EVEN
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1  ; ! Ela has -iste
!
!LEXICON I-ODD
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie FINAL1  ; ! Ela has -iste



! Special for cns-final names, due to nomsg
! =========================================

! LEXICON CNAME_ODD_SG !(still) not in use
!  NOMSG ;
!  OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
!  OBLIQUE_ODD ;
!
!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG !(still) not in use
! NOMSG ;
! OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
! OBLIQUE_EVEN ;


! LEXICON NOMSG !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Nom:           FINAL1 ;
! 
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_COMMON !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
! 
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_ODD !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>snie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>stie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>nie    FINAL1 ;

! LEXICON OBLIQUE_EVEN !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>ne     FINAL1 ;

! ---- Nominal derivation sublexica ----

LEXICON GIERIEHTSADTJE
  +Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
  +Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
                 EVEN_ESS ;
  +SgNomCmp:e    R ;
  +SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
  +PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;

LEXICON GÅATETJE
 +Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
 +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
      N_ODD_ESS ;
 +SgNomCmp:e            R ;
 +SgGenCmp:e%>n        R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
 
LEXICON GÅATETJEadj
  +Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPistie FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
  +Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
      N_ODD_ESS ;
 +SgNomCmp:e            R ;
 +SgGenCmp:e%>n        R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;

LEXICON NomActOdd
 +N+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
 +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  
LEXICON NomActEven
  +N+Sg: N_IE_SG ;
  +N+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
  +N:    N_IE_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ie              R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ie%>n           R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp+NoUml:ie%>j           R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp+Uml:%>%^iUMLi R ;

LEXICON LDAHKE
  +N+SgNomCmp:e    R ;
  +N+Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
  +N+Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
  +N:              EVEN_ESS ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ;
  
!LEXICON DAHKE 









! ===========================================
! Adjectives: Adjectival inflection sublexica
! ===========================================

! Basic adjectival lexica, infl types
! -----------------------------------

! even stems
! - - - - - 

! Lexical exceptions

LEXICON NOERE
 :noer e_E_EVENNOCOMP  ;
 :nuerie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :nööre MES ;
 :nuerie DIMCOMP ;  
 
LEXICON BUERIE
 :buer ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP  ;
 :buerie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :bööre MES ;
 :buerie DIMCOMP ;  
 
LEXICON LEEVLES
 :leevle ATTR_S  ;
+Use/NG:leevl PRED_S  ;
+Use/NG:leevle EVENCOMP  ;
+Use/NG:lyövl es_ES_EVEN  ;
+Use/NG:lïevl es_ES_EVEN  ;
+Use/NG:löövl es_ES_EVEN  ;
+Use/NG:lïevle EVENCOMPONLY ;
+Use/NG:löövle MES ;
+Use/NG:lïevle DIMCOMP ;  
 :lyövlehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;
  
LEXICON SOOKES
 :söök es_ES_EVENNOCOMP  ;
 :suekie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :sööke MES ;
 :suekie DIMCOMP ;  
 :sååkehk HKE_ODD_NGCOMP ;
 
LEXICON SOOJMES
 :sööjme ATTR_S  ;
+Use/NG:sööjme PRED_S  ;
+Use/NG:sööjme EVENCOMP  ;
+Use/NG:seejm es_ES_EVEN  ;
! :suejme EVENCOMPONLY ; ! finner ikke dok
 :sååjmehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;
 

LEXICON SMAAVE  ! both smaave and plaave
+Use/NG:aav e_E_EVENNOCOMP  ;
 :aav e_ES_EVENNOCOMP  ; ! LMM says so for plaave
! :aevie EVENCOMPONLY ; ! finner ikke dok
! :aevie MES ; !  finner ikke dok
 :aavie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :aavie MES ;
 :aevie DIMCOMP ;  
 
LEXICON SNAARE 
 :snaar e_ES_EVENNOCOMP  ;
 :snaerie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :sneere MES ;
 :snaerie DIMCOMP ;  

LEXICON ORRE
+Use/NG:urre EVENCOMPONLY ;
+Use/NG:urre EVENCOMP ;
+Use/NG:urre DIMCOMP ;  
 :orr e_E_EVEN ; !comment from Aajege
 
